Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-7111
Statewide critical incident stress management team; members; immunity.

No individual who provides gratuitous assistance to emergency service personnel as a member of the statewide critical incident stress management team in accordance with the Critical Incident Stress Management Act and the rules and regulations shall be held liable for any civil damages as a result of any act of commission or omission arising out of and in the course of rendering such assistance in good faith or any act or failure to act to provide or arrange for mental health treatment or care for emergency service personnel.

Laws 1991, LB 703, § 11;

Laws 1997, LB 184, § 11.